Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Transportation Improvement Districts

184.350.
Definitions for KRS 184.350 to 184.395.

As used in KRS

184.350

to

184.395

:

“Administrative agent” means a bank, trust company, or other person which has responsibility for authenticating, delivering, or redeeming commercial paper on behalf of the issuer;

“Agent” means, as applicable, one (1) or more of the persons who are administrative agents, indexing agents, remarketing agents, or other persons having responsibility for performing functions with respect to floating rate interest structures or put arrangements;

“Bond proceedings” means the resolutions, trust agreements, certifications, notices, sale proceedings, leases, lease-purchase agreements, assignments, credit enhancement facility agreements, and other agreements, instruments, and documents, as amended and supplemented, or any one (1) or more of a combination thereof, authorizing, or authorizing and providing for the terms and conditions applicable to, or providing for the security or sale or award or liquidity of, bonds, and includes the provisions set forth or incorporated in those bonds and bond proceedings;

“Bond service charges” means principal, including any mandatory sinking fund or mandatory redemption requirements for retirement of bonds, interest, and any redemption premium payable on bonds, as those payments come due and are payable to the bondholder or to a person making payment under a credit enhancement facility of those bond service charges to a bondholder;

“Bond service fund” means the applicable fund created by the bond proceedings for and pledged to the payment of bond service charges on bonds provided for by those proceedings, including all moneys, investments, and earnings from investments, credited and to be credited to that fund as provided in the bond proceedings;

“Bonds” means bonds, notes, including notes anticipating bonds or other notes, commercial paper, certificates of participation, or other evidences of obligation, including any interest coupons pertaining thereto, issued pursuant to KRS

184.350

to

184.395

;

“Commercial paper” means bonds with one (1) or more maturities of three hundred sixty-five (365) days or less which, under the bond proceedings, are expected to be funded by the issuance of additional bonds with maturities of three hundred sixty-five days (365) or less, whether or not ultimately funded with long term bonds;

“Cost” as applied to the construction of a project, includes:

The cost of construction, including bridges over or under existing highways and railroads;

Acquisition of all property required by the district for such construction;

Demolishing or removing any buildings or structures on acquired land, including the cost of acquiring any lands to which buildings or structures may be moved, site clearance, improvement, and preparation;

Diverting highways, interchanges with highways, and access roads to private property, including the cost of necessary land or easements;

All machinery, furnishings, and equipment, communications facilities, financing expenses, and interest prior to and during construction and for one (1) year after completion of construction;

Traffic estimates; indemnity, surety bonds, and premiums on insurance; guarantees; engineering; feasibility studies; legal expenses; plans; specifications; surveys; estimates of cost and revenues; and other expenses necessary or incidental to determining the feasibility or practicability of constructing a project;

Other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the construction of the project and the financing of such construction; and

Any obligation or expense incurred by any governmental agency or person for surveys, borings, preparation of plans and specifications, and other engineering services, or any other cost described in this subsection, in connection with the construction of a project, which may be regarded as part of the cost of the project and reimbursed from revenues, taxes, or the proceeds of bonds as authorized by KRS

184.350

to

184.395

;

“Credit enhancement facilities” means letters of credit; lines of credit; standby, contingent, or firm securities purchase agreements; insurance, or surety arrangements; guarantees, and other arrangements that provide for direct or contingent payment of bond service charges, for security or additional security in the event of nonpayment or default in respect of bonds, or for making payment of bond service charges and at the option and on demand of bondholders or at the option of the district or upon certain conditions occurring under put or similar arrangements, or for otherwise supporting the credit or liquidity of the bonds, and includes credit, reimbursement, marketing, remarketing, indexing, carrying, interest rate hedge, and subrogation agreements, and other agreements and arrangements for payment and reimbursement of the person providing the credit enhancement facility and the security for that payment and reimbursement;

“Financing expenses” means all costs and expenses relating to the authorization, issuance, sale, delivery, authentication, deposit, custody, clearing, registration, transfer, exchange, fractionalization, replacement, payment, and servicing of bonds, including without limitation costs and expenses for or relating to publication and printing, postage, delivery, preliminary and final official statements, offering circulars, and informational statements, travel and transportation, underwriters, placement agents, investment bankers, paying agents, registrars, authenticating agents, remarketing agents, custodians, clearing agencies or corporations, securities depositories, financial advisory services, certifications, audits, federal or state regulatory agencies, accounting and computation services, legal services and obtaining approving legal opinions and other legal opinions, credit ratings, redemption premiums, and credit enhancement facilities;

“Floating rate interest structure” means provisions in the bond proceedings whereby the interest rate or rates payable on the bonds, or upon successive series of commercial paper, vary from time-to-time pursuant to or in relation to an index provided by an indexing agent or otherwise established, a formula, base, publicly announced rate, yields on other obligations, determinations of an agent, or any one (1) or combination of the foregoing, with or without approval or consent of the absolute obligor or issuer as provided in the bond proceedings;

“Governmental agency” means a department, division, or other unit of state government; a county, city, municipal corporation or other political subdivision; a regional transit authority or regional transit commission created under KRS Chapter 96A; a port authority created under KRS

65.510

to

65.650

; and the United States or any agency thereof;

“Highway” has the same meaning as in KRS

189.010

;

“Indexing agent” means a person with responsibility for establishing, adjusting, and maintaining an index of interest rates or yields for purposes of a floating rate interest structure;

“Interest rate hedge” means any arrangement:

By which either:

The different interest costs or receipts at, between, or among fixed or floating interest rates, including at different floating interest rates, are exchanged on stated amounts of bonds or investments, or on notional amounts; or

A party will pay interest costs in excess of an agreed limitation; and

Which also may include a requirement for the issuer to issue bonds at a future date. This requirement shall be deemed to be part of the bond proceedings at the time the interest rate hedge is entered into. Issuance of bonds at a future date shall not require further legislative action, but shall be a ministerial act;

“Interest rate period” means that period of time during which an interest rate or rates established under a floating rate interest structure will pertain, which periods may be altered or become fixed pursuant to the bond proceedings upon stated occurrences or upon determination of the absolute obligor or issuer;

“Interstate system” means that portion of the interstate highway system, or the national highway system, located within the Commonwealth;

“Net revenues” means revenues lawfully available to pay both current operating expenses of a district and bond service charges in any fiscal year or other specified period, less current operating expenses of the district and any amount necessary to maintain a working capital reserve for that period;

“Outstanding,” as applied to bonds, means outstanding in accordance with the terms of the bonds and the applicable bond proceedings;

“Owner” includes any person having any title or interest in any property authorized to be acquired by a district under KRS

184.350

to

184.395

;

“Pledged revenues” means net revenues, moneys and investments, and earnings on those investments, in the applicable bond service fund and any other special funds, and the proceeds of any bonds issued for the purpose of refunding prior bonds, all as lawfully available and by resolution of the district committed for application as pledged revenues to the payment of bond service charges on particular issues of bonds;

“Project” means:

A highway or parking facility;

Freight rail tracks and necessarily related freight rail facilities;

Other transportation projects constructed or improved under KRS

184.350

to

184.395

and includes all bridges, tunnels, overpasses, underpasses, interchanges, or approaches that are determined by the district to be necessary for the safe merging of traffic between the project and those highways;

Service facilities, and administration, storage, and other buildings, property, and facilities, that the district considers necessary for the operation of the project; and

All property and rights that must be acquired by the district for the construction, maintenance, or operation of the project;

“Property” includes interests in property;

“Put arrangement” means provisions in the bond proceedings under which holders of the applicable bonds may exercise an option, or are required, to surrender the bonds or their ownership for an amount of payment previously established in or pursuant to the bond proceedings, at times, which may, but need not be, consistent with the ends of interest rate periods and which may be altered with or without the approval or consent, or upon the direction of, the absolute obligor or the issuer, as provided for in the bond proceedings;

“Refund” means to fund and retire outstanding bonds, including advance refunding with or without payment or redemption prior to stated maturity;

“Remarketing agent” means the person having responsibility for marketing or remarketing commercial paper or bonds with put arrangements, which may include responsibility for making recommendations or determinations as to prices or interest rates;

“Revenues” means:

All moneys received by a district with respect to the lease, sublease, or sale, including installment sale, conditional sale, or sale under a lease-purchase agreement, of a project;

All moneys received by a district under an agreement pursuant to KRS

184.395

;

Any gift or grant received with respect to a project;

All moneys received from increment bonds issued in accordance with the establishment of a local development area under KRS

65.7041

to

65.7083

; and

Proceeds of bonds issued under KRS

184.350

to

184.395

to the extent the use thereof for payment of principal or of premium, if any, or interest on the bonds is authorized by the district, proceeds from any insurance, condemnation, or guaranty pertaining to a project or property mortgaged to secure bonds or pertaining to the financing of a project, and income and profit from the investment of the proceeds of bonds or of any revenues;

“Special funds” means the applicable bond service fund and any accounts and subaccounts in that fund, any other funds or accounts permitted by, established under, and identified as a special fund or special account in the bond proceedings, including any special fund or account established for purposes of rebate or other requirements under federal income tax laws; and

“Transportation improvement district” or “district” means a transportation improvement district established pursuant to KRS

184.353

.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 180, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

184.353.
Creation of transportation improvement district — Board of trustees.

A transportation improvement district may be created by the legislative body of a city with a population of at least twenty thousand (20,000), a county, or by a group of up to three (3) contiguous counties. A transportation improvement district shall be governed by a board of trustees appointed as outlined in either subsection (3), (4), (5), or (6) of this section.

A transportation improvement district shall be considered:

A body both corporate and politic, and the exercise by it of the powers conferred by KRS

184.350

to

184.395

in the financing, construction, maintenance, repair, and operation of a project are and shall be held to be essential governmental functions; and

A special purpose governmental entity as defined in KRS

65A.010

and subject to the requirements and limitations in KRS Chapter 65A.

A transportation improvement district established by a city shall be governed by a board of trustees consisting of:

Five (5) voting members appointed by the legislative body of the city; and

One (1) nonvoting member appointed by the regional planning commission for the county. All members appointed under this subsection shall be residents of the city establishing the district. Two (2) of the voting members shall be members of a chamber of commerce in the city.

A transportation improvement district established by a single county shall be governed by a board of trustees consisting of:

Five (5) voting members appointed by the legislative body of the county;

One (1) nonvoting member appointed by the legislative body of the largest city in the county; and

One (1) nonvoting member appointed by the regional planning commission for the county.

All members appointed under this subsection shall be residents of the county establishing the district. Two (2) of the voting members shall be members of a chamber of commerce in the county.

A transportation improvement district established by two (2) counties shall be governed by a board of trustees consisting of:

Six (6) voting members, three (3) of whom shall be appointed by the legislative body of each county;

One (1) voting member appointed by the board of trustees of the district;

Two (2) nonvoting members, one (1) of whom shall be appointed by the legislative body of the largest city in each county; and

One (1) nonvoting member appointed by the regional planning commission for the counties making up the district.

All members appointed under this subsection shall be residents of one (1) of the counties establishing the district. One (1) of the voting members appointed by each county shall be members of a chamber of commerce located within that county.

A transportation improvement district established by three (3) counties shall be governed by a board of trustees consisting of:

Nine (9) voting members, three (3) of whom shall be appointed by the legislative body of each county;

Three (3) nonvoting members, one (1) of whom shall be appointed by the legislative body of the largest city in each county; and

One (1) nonvoting member appointed by the regional planning commission for the counties making up the district.

All members appointed under this subsection shall be residents of one (1) of the counties establishing the district. One (1) of the voting members appointed by each county shall be members of a chamber of commerce located within that county.

Except for initial appointments by the legislative bodies of cities and counties, each appointed member of the board shall hold office for a term of four (4) years but be subject to removal at the pleasure of the authority that appointed the member. Initial appointments to the board by the legislative body of a city or county shall be staggered so that no more than two (2) terms expire in any one (1) year. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any vacancy on the board shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

The voting members of the board shall elect from the entire board membership a chairperson, vice chairperson, and secretary-treasurer. A majority of the statutory number of voting members of the board constitutes a quorum, the affirmative vote of which is necessary for any action of the district. A vacancy in the membership of the board shall not impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all duties of the district.

Members of the board shall serve without pay, but shall be reimbursed for reasonable expenses from the district’s budget.

A city or county that establishes a district, or a city that is part of the district established by one (1) or more counties, may make appropriations from moneys available to them and not otherwise appropriated to pay costs incurred by the district in the exercise of its functions under KRS

184.350

to

184.395

.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 180, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

184.355.
Powers of district.

A transportation improvement district may:

Adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business;

Adopt an official seal;

Sue and be sued in its own name, plead and be impleaded, provided any actions against the district shall be brought in the Circuit Court of the county in which the principal office of the district is located, or in the Circuit Court of the county in which the cause of action arose, and all summonses, exceptions, and notices of every kind shall be served on the district by leaving a copy thereof at its principal office with the secretary-treasurer;

Purchase, construct, maintain, repair, sell, exchange, police, operate, or lease projects;

Issue transportation improvement district revenue bonds for the purpose of providing funds to pay the costs of any project or part thereof;

Maintain such funds as it considers necessary;

Direct its agents or employees, when properly identified in writing and after at least five (5) days’ written notice, to enter upon lands within its jurisdiction to make surveys and examinations preliminary to the location and construction of projects for the district, without liability of the district or its agents or employees except for actual damage done;

Make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its functions and the execution of its powers under KRS

184.350

to

184.395

;

Employ, retain, or contract for the services of consulting engineers, superintendents, managers, and such other engineers, construction and accounting experts, financial advisers, trustees, marketing, remarketing, and administrative agents, attorneys, and other employees, independent contractors, or agents as are necessary in its judgment and fix their compensation, provided all such expenses shall be payable solely from the proceeds of bonds or from revenues;

Receive and accept from the federal or any state or local government, including but not limited to any agency, entity, or instrumentality of any of the foregoing, loans and grants for or in aid of the construction, maintenance, or repair of any project, and receive and accept aid or contributions from any source or person of money, property, labor, or other things of value, to be held, used, and applied only for the purposes for which such loans, grants, and contributions are made. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as imposing any liability on this state for any loan received by a transportation improvement district from a third party unless this state has entered into an agreement to accept such liability;

Subject to the requirements of KRS

184.360

, acquire, hold, and dispose of property in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties under KRS

184.350

to

184.395

; and

Do all acts necessary and proper to carry out the powers expressly granted in KRS

184.350

to

184.395

.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 180, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

184.357.
Improvements — Hearing requirements — Contracts.

The board of trustees of a transportation improvement district may provide for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, alteration, or repair of any road, highway, public place, building, or other infrastructure, if the board determines that the public improvement will benefit the area where it will be constructed, reconstructed, improved, altered, or repaired.

Contracts for the improvements made under this section may provide that the improvement may be owned by the district or by the person or corporation supplying it to the district under a lease.

If the board of trustees of a district proposes an improvement described in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall conduct a hearing on the proposed improvement. The board shall indicate the area by metes and bounds in which the public improvement will be made and the area that will benefit from the improvement.

The board of trustees shall fix a day for a hearing on the proposed improvement. The secretary-treasurer of the board shall deliver, to each owner of a parcel of land or a lot that the board identifies as benefiting from the proposed improvement, a notice that sets forth the substance of the proposed improvement and the time and place of the hearing on it.

At least fifteen (15) days before the date set for the hearing, a copy of the notice shall be served upon the owner or left at the owner’s usual place of residence, or, if the owner is a corporation, upon an officer or agent of the corporation.

On or before the day of the hearing, the person serving notice of the hearing shall make return thereon, under oath, of the time and manner of service, and shall file the notice with the secretary-treasurer of the board.

At least fifteen (15) days before the day set for the hearing on the proposed improvement, the secretary-treasurer shall give notice to each nonresident owner of a lot or parcel of land in the area to be benefited by the improvement by publication once in a newspaper of general circulation in any counties in which this area is located. The publication of the notice shall be verified by affidavit of the printer or other person having knowledge of the publication and shall be filed with the secretary-treasurer of the district on or before the date of the hearing.

After the public hearing outlined in this subsection, the district shall present the improvement, including all relevant details, along with a summary of the public hearing, to the body or bodies that established the district. Each of those bodies must approve the project prior to the district being able to proceed.

At the time and place specified in the notice for a hearing on the proposed improvement, the board of trustees of the district shall meet and hear any and all testimony provided by any of the parties affected by the proposed improvement and by any other persons competent to testify.

The board or its representatives shall inspect, by an actual viewing, the area to be benefited by the proposed improvement. The board shall determine the necessity of the proposed improvement and may find that the proposed improvement will result in general as well as special benefits.

The board may award contracts or enter into a lease agreement for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, alteration, or repair of any improvement described in subsection (1) of this section and may issue notes, bonds, revenue anticipatory instruments, or other obligations, as authorized by KRS

184.350

to

184.395

, to finance the improvements.

If the board finds that the improvement will result in general or special benefits to the benefited area, it may request the body or bodies that created the district to establish a local development area in accordance with KRS

65.7041

to

65.7083

to allow for tax increment financing to help defray the cost of the project.

Costs and expenses may also be paid from the treasury of the district or from other available sources in amounts the board finds appropriate.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 180, § 4, effective July 14, 2022.

184.360.
Acquisition of property — Conditions — Exceptions.

A transportation improvement district may acquire by purchase, lease, lease-purchase, lease with option to purchase, appropriation, or otherwise in the manner and for the consideration it considers proper, any public or private property necessary, convenient, or proper for the construction, maintenance, repair, or operation of a project. The district may pledge net revenues, to the extent permitted by KRS

184.350

to

184.395

with respect to bonds, to secure payments to be paid by the district under such a lease, lease-purchase agreement, or lease with option to purchase. Title to real and personal property shall be held in the name of the district.

If a district cannot come to terms on any property purchase, the district may request the city or county that established the district to acquire the property in accordance with KRS

416.540

to

416.670

. Except as otherwise agreed to by the owner, full compensation shall be paid for public property so taken.

This section does not authorize a district to take or disturb property or facilities belonging to any public utility or to a common carrier engaged in interstate commerce when the property or facilities are required for the proper and convenient operation of the public utility or common carrier, unless provision is made for the restoration, relocation, replication, or duplication of the property or facilities elsewhere at the sole cost of the district.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

184.350

to

184.395

, disposition of real property shall be by sale, lease-purchase agreement, lease with option to purchase, or otherwise in the manner and for the consideration as the district determines if to a governmental agency, and otherwise in the manner provided in this section. Disposition of personal property shall be in the manner and for the consideration as the district determines.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 180, § 5, effective July 14, 2022.

184.363.
Board of trustees may acquire, hold, and sell property — Conditions.

The board of trustees of a district may:

Acquire, by any method other than condemnation, real property in fee simple in the name of the district in connection with, but in excess of that needed for, a project;

Hold the property for a period of time as the board determines; and

Sell at public auction or otherwise, all right, title, and interest of the district in the property, as the board considers in the best interests of the district; but in no event shall the property be sold for less than two-thirds (2/3) of its appraised value. Sale at public auction shall be undertaken only after the board advertises the sale in a newspaper of general circulation in the district for two (2) weeks prior to the date set for the sale or as provided in KRS

424.130

.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 180, § 6, effective July 14, 2022.

184.365.
Bonds — Issuance — Requirements — Bond proceedings — Board’s officers and employees not liable in personal capacities.

In addition to bonds issued in accordance with KRS

65.7041

to

65.7083

, the board of trustees of a transportation improvement district may provide by resolution for the issuance, at one (1) time or from time-to-time, of bonds of the district for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of any one (1) or more projects. The bond service charges shall be payable solely from pledged revenues pledged for such payment pursuant to the applicable bond proceedings. The bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall bear interest at a rate or rates or at variable rates, and shall mature or be payable at a time or times, with a final maturity not to exceed thirty (30) years from their date or dates, all as determined by the board in the bond proceedings. The board shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of bond service charges.

The bonds shall be signed by the chairperson or vice chairperson of the board or by the facsimile signature of that officer and the official seal of the district or a facsimile thereof may be affixed thereto or printed thereon and attested by the secretary-treasurer of the district, which may be by facsimile signature. Any coupons attached thereto shall bear the facsimile signature of the chairperson or vice chairperson of the board. In case any officer whose signature, or a facsimile of whose signature, appears on any bonds or coupons ceases to be the officer before delivery of the bonds, such signature or facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if the officer had remained in office until delivery.

Subject to the bond proceedings and provisions for registration, the bonds shall have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments. The bonds may be issued in the form or forms as the board determines, including without limitation coupon, book entry, and fully registered form, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the exchange of bonds between forms. The board may sell the bonds by competitive bid on the best bid after advertisement or request for bids or by private sale in the manner and for the price it determines to be for the best interest of the district.

The proceeds of the bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the payment of the costs of the project or projects for which the bonds were issued, and shall be disbursed in the manner and under the restrictions as the board provides in the bond proceedings.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the board may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds or bond anticipation notes, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when the bonds have been executed and are available for delivery. The board may provide for the replacement of any mutilated, stolen, destroyed, or lost bonds.

The provisions of KRS

424.360

shall apply to the bonds issued under this section.

The bond proceedings shall provide, subject to the provisions of any other applicable bond proceedings, for the pledge to the payment of bond service charges and of any costs of or relating to credit enhancement facilities of all, or a part as the board may determine, of the pledged revenues and the applicable special fund or funds, which pledges may be made to secure the bonds on a parity with bonds theretofore or thereafter issued if and to the extent provided in the bond proceedings. Every pledge, and every covenant and agreement with respect thereto, made in the bond proceedings may in the bond proceedings be extended to the benefit of the owners and holders of bonds and to any trustee and any person providing a credit enhancement facility for those bonds, for the further security for the payment of the bond service charges and credit enhancement facility costs.

The bond proceedings may contain additional provisions as to:

The redemption of bonds prior to maturity at the option of the board or of the bondholders or upon the occurrence of certain stated conditions, and at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as are provided in the bond proceedings;

Other terms of the bonds;

Limitations on the issuance of additional bonds;

The terms of any trust agreement securing the bonds or under which the same may be issued;

Any or every provision of the bond proceedings being binding upon the board, state agencies, or other persons as may from time to time have the authority under law to take such actions as may be necessary to perform all or any part of the duty required by the provision;

Any provision that may be made in a trust agreement; or

Any other or additional agreements with the holders of the bonds, or the trustee therefor, relating to the bonds or the security for the bonds, including agreements for credit enhancement facilities.

Any holder of bonds or a trustee under the bond proceedings, except to the extent that the holder’s or trustee’s rights are restricted by the bond proceedings, may, by any suitable form of legal proceedings, protect and enforce any rights under the laws of this state or granted by the bond proceedings. Those rights include the right to compel the performance of all duties of the board required by KRS

184.350

to 184. 395 or the bond proceedings; to enjoin unlawful activities; and in the event of default with respect to the payment of any bond service charges on any bonds or in the performance of any covenant or agreement on the part of the board contained in the bond proceedings, to apply to a court having jurisdiction of the cause to appoint a receiver to receive and administer the revenues and the pledged revenues which are pledged to the payment of the bond service charges on the bonds or that are the subject of the covenant or agreement, with full power to pay, and to provide for payment of, bond service charges on the bonds, and with the powers, subject to the direction of the court, as are accorded receivers in general equity cases, excluding any power to pledge additional revenue or receipts or other income, funds, or moneys of the board to the payment of the bond service charges and excluding the power to take possession of, mortgage, or cause the sale or otherwise dispose of any project or other property of the board.

Each duty of the board and the board’s officers and employees, undertaken pursuant to the bond proceedings, is hereby established as a duty of the board, and of each officer, member, or employee having authority to perform the duty.

The board’s officers or employees are not liable in their personal capacities on any bonds issued by the board or any agreements of or with the board relating to those bonds.

The bonds are lawful investments for banks, savings and loan associations, credit unions, trust companies, trustees, fiduciaries, insurance companies, including domestic for life and domestic not for life, trustees or other officers having charge of sinking and bond retirement or other funds of the state or its political subdivisions and taxing districts, the commissioners of the sinking fund of the state, the Kentucky Workers’ Compensation Funding Commission, state-administered retirement systems as defined in KRS

7A.210

, and also are acceptable as security for the repayment of the deposit of public moneys.

Provision may be made in the applicable bond proceedings for the establishment of separate accounts in the bond service fund and for the application of such accounts only to the specified bond service charges pertinent to such accounts and bond service fund, and for other accounts therein within the general purposes of the fund.

The board may pledge all, or any portion as it determines, of the pledged revenues to the payment of bond service charges, and for the establishment and maintenance of any reserves and special funds, as provided in the bond proceedings, and make other provisions therein with respect to pledged revenues, revenues, and net revenues as authorized by KRS

184.350

to 184. 395, which provisions shall be controlling notwithstanding any other provisions of law pertaining thereto.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 180, § 7, effective July 14, 2022.

184.367.
Refunding bonds.

The board of trustees of a transportation improvement district may provide by resolution for the issuance of bonds of the district, payable solely from pledged revenues, for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding, including the payment of related financing expenses and, if considered advisable by the board, for the additional purpose of paying costs of improvements, extensions, renovations, or enlargements of any project. The issuance of refunding bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the board in respect to the bonds shall be governed by the provisions of KRS

184.350

to

184.395

insofar as they are applicable and by the applicable bond proceedings.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 180, § 8, effective July 14, 2022.

184.370.
Bonds not a debt of the state.

Bonds issued by a district do not constitute a debt, or a pledge of the faith and credit, of the state or of any political subdivision of the state. Bond service charges on outstanding bonds are payable solely from the pledged revenues pledged for their payment as authorized by KRS

184.350

to

184.395

and as provided in the bond proceedings. All bonds shall contain on their face a statement to that effect.

All expenses incurred in carrying out KRS

184.350

to

184.395

shall be payable solely from revenues provided under KRS

184.350

to

184.395

. KRS 184.350 to 184.395 does not authorize the board of trustees of a district to incur indebtedness or liability on behalf of or payable by the state or any political subdivision of the state.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 180, § 9, effective July 14, 2022.

184.373.
Trust agreements — Conditions.

In the discretion of the board of trustees of a transportation improvement district, any bonds may be secured by a trust agreement between the board and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state but authorized to exercise trust powers within this state.

Any trust agreement may pledge or assign the revenues to be received, but shall not convey or mortgage any project or any part thereof. Any trust agreement or other bond proceedings may contain provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as are reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the board in relation to the acquisition of property, the construction, maintenance, and repair of the project or projects in connection with which the bonds are authorized and the custody, safeguarding, application of all moneys, and provisions for the employment or retention of the services of consulting engineers in connection with the construction, maintenance, or repair of the project or projects. Any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this state which may act as depository of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues may furnish such indemnifying bonds or may pledge such securities as are required by the board. Any such trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee, may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders as is customary in revenue bond trust agreements of public bodies, and may contain other provisions as the board considers reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in entering into or carrying out the provisions of any trust agreement may be treated as a part of the cost of the project or projects.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 180, § 10, effective July 14, 2022.